Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 19 Comprehensive Adolescent Pregnancy and Parenting Program

40-19-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds:

In 1988, there were one thousand four hundred sixty-one (1,461) births to adolescents under the age of twenty (20) in the state.

Adolescents coping with a pregnancy have a greater risk than the average pregnant woman for:

Inadequate nutrition;

Prenatal care starting well into the second trimester;

Living in poverty households; and finally

More likely to drop out of school.

The literature on adolescents also shows an increase in drug and alcohol use and a rise in depression and suicide.

The student dropout rates in the state are as follows:

Pregnant and parenting adolescent students face more educational barriers due to student’s high absenteeism, inattentiveness in class, have increased problems of illiteracy and lack the motivation to stay in school during the pregnancy or to return to school after the infant is born.

A prime factor in parenting students dropping out of school is the absence of child care, either in the school, community, or home.

In the fourteen (14) adolescent pregnancy and parenting programs that currently exist in the state, four (4) of which also have childcare centers, the following is evident:

In 1988, thirty-three percent (33%) or four hundred seventy-five (475) out of one thousand four hundred sixty-one (1,461) pregnant adolescents receive community-based services; and

In 1988, sixty-seven percent (67%) or nine hundred eighty-six (986) out of one thousand four hundred sixty-one (1,461) pregnant adolescents do not receive any community-based services.

That of the clients currently enrolled in services in the state the following is established:

In some communities the dropout rate for pregnant students has completely reversed from eighty percent (80%) drop out to ninety percent (90%) graduates; and

Statewide, programs have demonstrated a thirty-five percent (35%) increase in education from intake into programs; and

Students who have child care are more likely to return to school after the pregnancy and remain until graduation; and

Adolescent parents equipped with a high school diploma are more likely to be self-sufficient, capable parents able to find and keep employment while caring for their family and less likely to need public assistance on a long-term basis.

The long-term cost savings are significant as comparisons are made between the cost of providing services to each pregnant and parenting adolescent as one thousand six hundred forty two dollars ($1,642) yearly with an additional cost for daycare services on site in school based programs of three thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($3,115) yearly as compared to the cost of providing welfare, food stamps, and medical assistance to each client on a yearly basis of eight thousand four hundred dollars ($8,400).

The long-term cost savings is significant as adolescent mothers equipped with a high school diploma are more able to find employment, continue career options, and care for themselves and child, therefore becoming less dependent on public assistance (income maintenance) after graduation.

Rhode Island must provide the earliest possible support to pregnant adolescents for reasons both of compassion and cost-effectiveness.

Cranston 23.7% Newport 27% Pawtucket 30.1% Providence 42.4% Warwick 16.4% West Warwick 29.7% Woonsocket 37.1%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 269, § 1.

40-19-2.
Comprehensive parenting and pregnancy program established.

The state, under the supervision of the department of human services, shall establish the statewide comprehensive adolescent pregnancy and parenting program, which will include the existing department of human service programs, Project Hope, and Pawtucket’s school-based adolescent pregnancy project, providing both school-based and community-based services including, but not necessarily limited to, the following:

To assist pregnant adolescents in accessing early comprehensive and complete prenatal and pediatric care that will be sensitive to the special needs and risks of adolescents and infants;

Mobilize resources and/or provide support services to access adequate parenting programs, family involvement, nutrition programs, transportation, clothing, childcare programs and job training and employment opportunities;

In cooperation with the school systems, coordinate the design of an educational plan to include options for completing high school programs;

In cooperation with the school systems, coordinate the development of plans to reach pregnant students in order to offer services and support to encourage pregnant and parenting students to remain and complete their high school education;

Provide for crisis intervention and emergency assistance;

Home management and parenting and nutrition skill building opportunities;

Encourage program providers to employ staff that is reflective of the racial and ethnic populations of the adolescents in their community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 269, § 1.

40-19-3.
Powers and duties of the department of human services.

The department of human services shall, within the specific appropriation for this program, establish and evaluate the statewide comprehensive adolescent pregnancy and parenting program to be established pursuant to §

40-19-2

and shall make and establish rules and regulations as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of the chapter. The department of human services shall allocate and expend any money in the treasury designated in the department for adolescent pregnancy and parenting programs, solely for the purpose and operation of the adolescent pregnancy programs, including legislative funding for both community-based programs of Warwick’s Project Hope and Pawtucket’s school-based adolescent pregnancy project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 269, § 1.